src/komi-verb-lexc.txt
Multichar_Symbols

к6
л6

!This is the epsilon tag given when the marker is a zero, 
!as in the Sg Conneg
Z1

! tags
+Sg1
+Sg2
+Sg3
+Pl1
+Pl2
+Pl3
+CliticDzhik
+CliticKody
+CliticMoz
+Conneg
+Fut
+Ger
+Inf
!Intransitive Verb used with 3Sg Past
+IV
+Neg
+NoClitic
+Obj
+Past
+Perf
!Infinitive form with no reference to person "ны"
+Positive
+Pres
+Sg
+Subj


LEXICON Root
!Verbs of Negation
ог+Pres+Neg+1Sg:ог Clitic ;
он+Pres+Neg+2Sg:он Clitic ;
оз+Pres+Neg+3Sg:оз Clitic ;
огӧ+Pres+Neg+1Pl:огӧ Clitic ;
онӧ+Pres+Neg+2Pl:онӧ Clitic ;
огӧй+Pres+Neg+1Pl:огӧй Clitic ;
онӧй+Pres+Neg+2Pl:онӧй Clitic ;
оз+Pres+Neg+3Pl:оз Clitic ;

!Past Neg
эг+Past+Neg+1Sg:эг Clitic ;
эн+Past+Neg+2Sg:эн Clitic ;
эз+Past+Neg+3Sg:эз Clitic ;
эг+Past+Neg+1Pl:эг Clitic ;
эн+Past+Neg+2Pl:эн Clitic ;
эгӧ+Past+Neg+1Pl:эгӧ Clitic ;
энӧ+Past+Neg+2Pl:энӧ Clitic ;
эз+Past+Neg+3Pl:эз Clitic ;

 Verb1 ;
 Verb2 ;
 Verb3 ;


LEXICON Verb1
 Finite ;
 Infinite ;

LEXICON Verb2
 Finite ;
 Infinite ;

LEXICON Verb3
 Finite ;
 Infinite ;


!
!KM:239
LEXICON Finite 
! Present
+Pres+1Sg:^а Clitic ;
+Pres+2Sg:^ан Clitic ;
+Pres+3Sg:^ӧ Clitic ;
+Pres+1Pl:^ам Clitic ;
+Pres+1Pl:^амӧй Clitic ;
+Pres+2Pl:^анныд Clitic ;
+Pres+2Pl:^ад Clitic ;
+Pres+3Pl:^ӧны Clitic ;
+Conneg+Sg:^Z1 # ;
+Conneg+1Pl:^ӧ # ;
+Conneg+2Pl:^ӧ # ;
+Conneg+1Pl:^ӧй # ;
+Conneg+2Pl:^ӧй # ;
+Conneg+3Pl:^ны # ;

!Future
+Fut+3Sg:^ас Clitic ;
+Fut+3Pl:^асны Clitic ;


!Past
+Past+1Sg:^і Clitic ;
+Past+2Sg:^ін Clitic ;
+Past+3Sg:^іс Clitic ;
+IV+Past+3Sg:^і Clitic ;
+Past+1Pl:^ім Clitic ;
+Past+1Pl:^імӧй Clitic ;
+Past+2Pl:^інныд Clitic ;
+Past+2Pl:^ід Clitic ;
+Past+3Pl:^існы Clitic ;

!Perfect
+Perf+Sg1:^ӧма Clitic ;
+Perf+Sg2:^ӧмыд Clitic ;
+Perf+Sg3:^ӧма Clitic ;
+Perf+Pl1:^ӧмаӧсь Clitic ;
+Perf+Pl2:^ӧмныд Clitic ;
+Perf+Pl3:^ӧмаӧсь Clitic ;
!KM:251
+Perf+Pl1:^ӧмась Clitic ;
+Perf+Pl2:^ӧмныдӧсь Clitic ;
+Perf+Pl3:^ӧмны Clitic ;

LEXICON Infinite
+Inf+Positive:ны Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Sg1:ным Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Sg2:ныд Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Sg3:ныс Clitic ;
+Inf+Obj+Sg2:нытӧ Clitic ;
+Inf+Obj+Sg3:нысӧ Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Pl1:ным Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Pl2:ныд Clitic ;
+Inf+Subj+Pl3:ныс Clitic ;
+Inf+Obj+Pl2:нытӧ Clitic ;
+Inf+Obj+Pl3:нысӧ Clitic ;

!
!LEXICON Gerund
!

LEXICON Clitic
!KM:311
+CliticDzhik:джык # ;
!KM:312
+CliticKody:кодь # ;
+CliticMoz:моз # ;
+NoClitic # ;

END
